da: Pickup-design: Permanent; Midlertidig; Andet
hr-HR: Dizajn gitarskog magneta: Trajni; Privremeni; Ostalo
pt-PT: Design de captação: Permanente; Temporário; Outro
ja: ピックアップ設計: 取り外し不可; 一時的; その他
it: Design del ritiro: Permanenti; Temporaneo; Altro
es: Diseño de camioneta: Permanente; Temporal; Otros
th: การออกแบบรถกระบะ: ถาวร; ชั่วคราว; อื่นๆ
pl: Konstrukcja przetwornika: Stała; Tymczasowa; Inne
de: Tonabnehmer-Design: Permanent; Vorübergehend; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Design de picape: Permanente; Temporário; Outro
sl-SI: Zasnova magnetov: Trajna; Začasna; Drugo
nb: Pickupdesign: Permanent; Midlertidig; Annet
hu: Hangszedő kialakítása: Tartós; Ideiglenes; Egyéb
lt-LT: Garso ėmiklio dizainas: Įmontuotas; Nuimamas; Kita
fr: Conception du micro: Permanent; Temporaire; Autre
nl: Ontwerp pickup: Permanent; Tijdelijk; Andere
sk-SK: Dizajn snímača: Trvalý; Dočasný; Iné
tr: Pikap tasarımı: Kalıcı; Geçici; Diğer
zh-TW: 敞篷小貨車設計: 永久型; 暫時; 其他
sv: Design på pickup: Permanent; Temporär; Övrigt
zh-CN: 拾音器设计: 永久性; 临时用; 其他
ro-RO: Design doză: Permanentă; Temporară; Altele
el: Σχεδιασμός μαγνήτη: Μόνιμο; Προσωρινός; Άλλο
fi: Pickup-muotoilu: Pysyvä; Väliaikainen; Muu
bg-BG: Дизайн на пикап: Постоянно; Временно; Други
ru: Конструкция звукоснимателя: Постоянный; Временный; Другое
vi: Thiết kế xe bán tải: Vĩnh viễn; Tạm thời; Khác
en: Pickup design: Permanent; Temporary; Other
ko: 픽업 디자인: 영구; 일시적인; 기타
cs: Design pickupu: Permanentní; Dočasné; Jiné